Washington statutes.
RCW 35.61.230

Objections—Appeal.

Any person, firm or corporation feeling aggrieved by the assessment against his or her or its property may file objections with the city council and may appeal from the order confirming the assessment roll in the same manner as objections and appeals are made in regard to local improvements in cities of the first class.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2112; 1965 c 7 s 35.61.230. Prior: 1943 c 264 s 16; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6741-16; prior: 1907 c 98 s 17; RRS s 6736.]

NOTES:

Appeal of assessments and reassessments: RCW 35.44.200 through 35.44.270.